da: Planhed for felt: Plan; Halvplan; Super-plan; Andet
ru: Плоскостность поля: План; Полуплан; Суперплан; Другой
hu: Mező síksága: Sík; Félig sík; Nagyon sík; Egyéb
tr: Alan düzlüğü: Plan; Yarı plan; Süper plan; Diğer
ja: 照射野の平坦度: プラン; セミプラン; スーパープラン; その他
sk-SK: Rovinnosť poľa: Plán; Poloplán; Super plán; Iné
zh-TW: 場平坦度: 平場消色差; 半平場消色差; 超級平場消色差; 其他
pt-PT: Planicidade do campo: Plano; Semiplano; Super plano; Outro
vi: Độ phẳng trường: Sơ đồ; Sơ đồ một phần; Sơ đồ lớn; Khác
fr: Planéité du champ: Plan; Demi-plan; Super plan; Autre
ro-RO: Caracterul plan al câmpului: Plan; Semiplan; Super plan; Altele
el: Επιπεδότητα πεδίου: Κάτοψη; Ημι-κάτοψη; Ευρεία κάτοψη; Άλλο
pt-BR: Planura do campo: Plano; Semiplano; Superplano; Outro
zh-CN: 场地平整度: 平场; 半平场; 超平场; 其他
sv: Fältets planhet: Plan; Semiplan; Superplan; Övrigt
th: ความเรียบของสนาม: แผน; แผนกึ่งหนึ่ง; แผนซูเปอร์; อื่นๆ
de: Feldebene: Plan; Semi-plan; Super-plan; Sonstiges
en: Field flatness: Plan; Semi-plan; Super plan; Other
cs: Rovnost pole: Plán; Poloplán; Super plán; Jiné
sl-SI: Ploskost polja: Ravna; Polravna; Zeloravna; Drugo
bg-BG: Плоскост на полето: План; Полуплан; Супер план; Други
es: Planitud del campo: Plano; Semiplano; Súperplano; Otros
nl: Vlakheid van het veld: Plan; Semi-plan; Superplan; Andere
fi: Kentän tasaisuus: Tasokuva; Puolitasokuva; Supertasokuva; Muu
nb: Feltflathet: Plan; Halvplan; Superplan; Annet
lt-LT: Lauko plokštumas: Lygus; Su nedideliu nuolydžiu; Itin lygus; Kita
it: Planarità del campo: Piano; Semipiano; Super piano; Altro
hr-HR: Zakrivljenost polja: Ravno; Poluravno; Iznimno ravno; Ostalo
pl: Płaskość pola: Płaska; Niemal płaska; Superpłaska; Inne
ko: 필드 평편도: 플랜; 세미 플랜; 슈퍼 플랜; 기타